Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-145
Holt.

The county of Holt is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-five, north, of range sixteen, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-five, north, of range nine, west; thence north to the middle of the main channel of the Niobrara River, thence up said channel to a point where the second guide meridian intersects the same; thence south along said second guide meridian, to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 27, p. 217;

R.S.1913, § 858;

C.S.1922, § 760;

C.S.1929, § 25-147;

R.S.1943, § 22-145.

Attempt to extend boundary in 1883 was void. State ex rel. Norton v. Van Camp and Kruse, 36 Neb. 9, 54 N.W. 113 (1893).